North Carolina statutes. Chapter 142. State Debt.
Article 9. State Capital Facilities Finance Act.
§ 142-83.
Authorization of special indebtedness; General Assembly approval.

General Assembly Approval. — The State may incur or issue special indebtedness subject to the terms and conditions provided in this Article for the purpose of financing the cost of capital facilities that meet one of the following conditions:

The General Assembly has enacted legislation describing the capital facility and authorizing its financing by the incurrence or issuance of special indebtedness up to a specific maximum amount.

The General Assembly has enacted legislation authorizing the incurrence or issuance of special indebtedness up to a specific maximum amount for a specific category of capital facilities and the capital facility meets all of the conditions set in that legislation.

Limitation. — The General Assembly may enact legislation to incur or issue special indebtedness under subsection (a) of this section only if it determines at the time the legislation is enacted that the amount of special indebtedness authorized by the legislation does not exceed the limitation in this subsection. The determination of the General Assembly must be based upon reasonable estimations and once made may be relied upon as conclusive.The sum of the special indebtedness authorized by the legislation and all other special indebtedness authorized by legislation enacted after January 1, 2013, may not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the bond indebtedness of the State supported by the General Fund that was authorized pursuant to legislation enacted after January 1, 2013. For purposes of this section, bond indebtedness supported by the General Fund includes both special indebtedness and general obligation bond indebtedness of the State that is supported by the General Fund.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79; 2013-78, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws,
2003-284, ss. 46A.1(a) through (e), provide: “(a) Acquisition of Correctional Facilities.—In accordance with

G.S. 142-83

, as enacted by this act, this section authorizes the issuance or incurrence of financing contract indebtedness to be used to acquire two correctional facilities that the State currently leases located in Pamlico County and Avery County. The State Treasurer is authorized to give notice for, arrange, and consummate the purchase of these facilities in accordance with this section.

“(b) Pamlico County Correctional Facility.—The State is authorized to acquire the correctional facility located in Pamlico County that the State currently leases from U.S. Corrections Corporation pursuant to the purchase option provision in the lease. Title to these facilities shall be held in the name of the State. The cost of acquiring the Pamlico County correctional facility shall be financed as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes.

“(c) Mountain View Correctional Facility.—The State is authorized to acquire the Mountain View Correctional Facility located in Avery County that the State currently leases from Correctional Properties Trust pursuant to the purchase option provision in the lease. Title to these facilities shall be held in the name of the State. The cost of acquiring the Mountain View Correctional Facility shall be financed as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes.

“(d) Authorization of Financing Contracts.—The State, with the prior approval of the State Treasurer and the Council of State as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, is authorized to execute and deliver one or more financing contracts in order to provide funds to the State to be used, together with any other available funds, to pay the cost of acquiring either or both of the Pamlico County correctional facility and the Mountain View Correctional Facility described in this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 142-83

, no maximum
principal amount is required to be stated in this section authorizing the issuance or incurrence of financing contract indebtedness for these purposes.

“(e) Transition.—Funds are appropriated in this act to the Department of Correction in each year of the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium to directly or indirectly pay the property taxes levied on the two facilities to be acquired pursuant to this section. The Department of Correction shall make these payments in the amounts appropriated for the biennium only and, depending upon the ownership status of each facility for each respective tax year, may recharacterize one or more of the payments as fees in lieu of the original obligation.”

Session Laws
2003-284, s. 46A.2, provides for the issuance or incurrence of funds for youth development centers.

Session Laws
2003-284, s. 46A.3, provides for the issuance or incurrence of funds for a structural pest control training facility.

Session Laws
2003-284, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2003.’ ”

Session Laws
2003-284, s. 49.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2003-284, s. 49.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2004-179, ss. 1, 1.1 and 1.2, as amended by Session Laws
2005-276, s. 30.3A, as amended by Session Laws
2006-146, s. 2.1, as amended by Session Laws
2006-231, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws
2008-107, s. 27.8(b), as amended by Session Laws
2009-209, s. 2(d) and (e), and as amended by Session Laws
2009-451, s. 27.7(a), provides: “This part may be cited as the State Capital Facilities Act of 2004.

“In accordance with

G.S. 142-83

, this section authorizes the issuance or incurrence of special indebtedness in the following maximum aggregate principal amounts to finance the costs of the following projects. The table below provides the maximum principal amounts. The first column is the aggregate maximum principal amount. The second column is the maximum portion of this amount that can be issued or incurred before July 1, 2005. The State, with the prior approval of the State Treasurer and the Council of State, as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, is authorized to issue or incur special indebtedness in order to provide funds to the State to be used, together with other available funds, to pay the cost of these projects.

$180,000,000 $110,000,000 Acquiring, constructing, and equipping a new cancer rehabilitation and treatment center, a nearby physicians’ office building, and a walkway between the two, all to be located at the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill. 60,000,000 30,000,000 Acquiring, constructing, and equipping the North Carolina Cardiovascular Diseases Institute at East Carolina University. 35,000,000 25,000,000 Acquiring, constructing, and equipping a Bioinformatics Center at the University of North Carolina at Charlotte. 28,000,000 25,000,000 Acquiring, constructing, and equipping a stand-alone facility to house the new Pharmacy School program to be located at Elizabeth City State University, and interim temporary facilities to house the program during construction of the facility. 35,000,000 25,000,000 Acquiring, constructing, and equipping a Center for Health Promotion and Partnerships at the University of North Carolina at Asheville. 10,000,000 10,000,000 Land acquisition, site preparation, engineering, architectural, and other consulting services, and construction for the Southeastern North Carolina Nursing Education and Research Center at Fayetteville State University. 10,000,000 10,000,000 Site preparation, engineering, architectural, and other consulting services, and the construction of a research building on the joint Millennial Campus of North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University and the University of North Carolina at Greensboro. 10,000,000 10,000,000 Land acquisition, site preparation, engineering, architectural, and other consulting services, and construction of a Nursing and Allied Health Building at the University of North Carolina at Pembroke. 9,279,037 9,279,037 To Western Carolina University for land acquisition, site preparation, engineering, architectural, and other consulting services, and construction of a building for Western Carolina University and the Mountain Area Health Education Consortium for the North Carolina Center for Health and Aging to be operated as a consortium among Western Carolina University, the University of North Carolina at Asheville, and the Mountain Area Health Education Consortium. 11,500,000 10,000,000 Land acquisition, site preparation, engineering, architectural, and other consulting services, acquisition of an existing building, construction, or renovation of a Center for Design Innovation to be operated jointly by Winston-Salem State University and the North Carolina School of the Arts. TOTAL: $388,797,037 $264,297,037

Click to view

“In accordance with

G.S. 142-83

, this section authorizes the issuance or incurrence of special indebtedness in the maximum aggregate principal amount of thirty-five million two hundred thousand dollars ($35,200,000) to finance the costs of constructing up to five youth development centers totaling up to 224 beds to be operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention and to be located as determined by that Department. The State, with the prior approval of the State Treasurer and the Council of State, as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, is authorized to issue or incur special indebtedness in order to provide funds to the State to be used, together with other available funds, to pay the cost of constructing the projects described by this section. Of the special indebtedness authorized by this section, no more than thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000) may be issued or incurred before July 1, 2005.”

Session Laws
2004-179, s. 8.3, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2005.’ ”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 46.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only
to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 46.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 23.12(a)-(h), as amended by Session Laws
2008-107, s. 27.8(c), Session Laws
2009-209, s. 2(c), and Session Laws
2017-57, s. 36.9(a)-(c), authorizes the issuance or incurrence of special indebtedness to finance the capital facility costs of various construction projects.

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2006.”’

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 28.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2006-2007 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2006-2007 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 28.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2006-231, s. 2, provides: “In accordance with

G.S. 142-83

, this section authorizes the issuance or incurrence of special indebtedness in the maximum aggregate principal amount of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to finance the costs of purchasing land to be administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission as State game lands. The State, with the prior approval of the State Treasurer and the Council of State, as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, is authorized to issue or incur special indebtedness in order to provide funds to the State to be used, together with other available funds, to pay the costs of purchasing the land described in this section.”

Session Laws
2006-231, s. 4, provides: “In accordance with

G.S. 142-83

, this section authorizes the issuance or incurrence of special indebtedness in the maximum aggregate principal amount of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to finance the capital facility costs of a new parking deck to be constructed in downtown Raleigh. The State, with the prior approval of the State Treasurer and the Council of State, as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, is authorized to issue or incur special indebtedness in order to provide funds to the State to be used, together with other available funds, to pay the capital facility costs of the project described in this section.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 27.8(a), as amended by Session Laws
2009-209, s. 2(a), as amended by Session Laws
2009-451, ss. 27.7(b) and 27.12,
as amended by Session Laws
2011-66, s. 2, and as amended by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 40.14(a), provides: “(a) The State, with the prior approval of the State Treasurer and the Council of State, as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, is authorized to issue or incur special indebtedness in order to provide funds to the State to be used, together with other available funds, to pay the capital facility costs of the projects described in this subsection. In accordance with

G.S. 142-83

, this subsection authorizes the issuance or incurrence of special indebtedness:

“(1) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of sixty-one million five hundred ninety-nine thousand three hundred sixty-nine dollars ($61,599,369) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a School of Dentistry building, life safety improvements to the Brody School of Medicine, and renovation of space at the ECU Health Science Campus, Brody School of Medicine, to accommodate the dental school at East Carolina University and no more than 10 satellite dental clinics across the State. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of twenty-one million dollars ($21,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010.

“(2) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of thirty-five million one hundred ninety-eight thousand five hundred thirty-seven dollars ($35,198,537) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a family medicine building at East Carolina University. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of sixteen million six hundred thousand dollars ($16,600,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009.

“(3) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of sixteen million six hundred eighty-nine thousand five hundred seven dollars ($16,689,507) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a School of Education building at Elizabeth City State University. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010.

“(4) Repealed by Session Laws
2011-66, s. 2, effective May 3, 2011.

“(5) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of nineteen million forty-nine thousand six hundred twenty-eight dollars ($19,049,628) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a general classroom building at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009.

“(6) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of twenty-two million five hundred thirty-six thousand thirty-nine dollars ($22,536,039) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a nursing building at North Carolina Central University. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of six million dollars ($6,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010.

“(7) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of ten million two hundred thirty-seven thousand one hundred sixteen dollars ($10,237,116) to finance the capital facility costs of completing, separately or together, a central storage facility and a police operations center at the University of North Carolina School of the Arts.

“(8) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of eleven million five hundred forty-three thousand eight hundred twenty-eight dollars ($11,543,828) to finance the capital facility costs of constructing, purchasing, or renovating an existing building for a film school production facility of the University of North Carolina School of the Arts. No special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of two million dollars ($2,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of seven million nine hundred thousand dollars ($7,900,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2011.

“(9) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of ninety-eight million three hundred forty-one thousand one hundred eighty-six dollars ($98,341,186) to finance the capital facility costs of completing the Centennial Campus library at North Carolina State University. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of forty-nine million dollars ($49,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of sixty-five million three hundred forty-one thousand one hundred eighty-six dollars ($65,341,186) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2011.

“(10) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of four million dollars ($4,000,000) for the capital facility costs of completing the 4-H Campuses at North Carolina State University.

“(11) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of sixty-one million five hundred ninety-nine thousand three hundred sixty-nine dollars ($61,599,369) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a School of Dentistry expansion at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill. No special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of fifty-five million eight hundred nineteen thousand five hundred fifty-eight dollars ($55,819,558) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2011.

“(12) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of fifty-two million four hundred ninety-four thousand one hundred forty-nine dollars ($52,494,149) to finance the capital facility costs of completing the Energy Production Infrastructure Center at the University of North Carolina at Charlotte. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of thirty-two million two hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($32,218,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010.

“(13) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of forty-two million six hundred seventy thousand dollars ($42,670,000) to finance the capital facility costs of completing an academic classroom and office building at the University of North Carolina at Greensboro. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of twenty-one million dollars ($21,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009.

“(14) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to finance the capital facility costs of installing fire sprinklers in The University of North Carolina System residence halls.

“(15) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to finance the capital improvement costs of acquiring State land throughout The University of North Carolina System.

“(16) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of thirty-four million dollars ($34,000,000) to finance the capital improvement costs of purchasing State judicial facilities located at 901 Corporate Drive, Raleigh, NC, and more particularly described as Phase Two, Tract A of Raleigh Corporate Center consisting of 17.28 acres and as shown on the map recorded in Map book 1987, page 720, and Map book 1990, page 576, of the Wake County Register of Deeds.

“(17) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of forty-one million six hundred seventy thousand dollars ($41,670,000) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a health care and mental health facility at the North Carolina Correctional Institute for Women. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of twenty-seven million dollars ($27,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009.

“(18) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of twelve million ninety-five thousand four hundred forty-five dollars ($12,095,445) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a minimum security addition at Scotland Correctional Institution. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of six million dollars ($6,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010.

“(19) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of seventeen million six hundred seventeen thousand eight hundred eighty-four dollars ($17,617,884) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a medium security addition at Bertie Correctional Institution. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010.

“(20) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of twelve million ninety-five thousand four hundred forty-five dollars ($12,095,445) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a minimum security addition at Tabor Correctional Institution. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of six million dollars ($6,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010.

“(21) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of seventeen million six hundred seventeen thousand eight hundred eighty-four dollars ($17,617,884) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a medium security addition at Lanesboro Correctional Institution. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2009. No more than a maximum aggregate amount of fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) of special indebtedness may be issued or incurred under this subdivision prior to July 1, 2010.

“(22) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of two million nine hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($2,925,000) to finance the capital facility costs of completing Phase I of the CSS Neuse State Historic Site.

“(23) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) to finance the capital facility costs of completing Port of Morehead City Berth Improvements and Phase I of Port of Wilmington Berth 8 Improvements.

“(24) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of three million seven hundred thousand dollars ($3,700,000) to finance the capital facility costs of completing a Southeastern North Carolina Agriculture Center Pavilion.

“(25) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of seven million four hundred fifteen thousand four hundred sixty-one dollars ($7,415,461) to finance the capital facility costs of Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services capital improvements. Sales proceeds shall be allocated between the projects in the following manner:

“Project Allocation of Sales Proceeds “Bathroom and truckshed expansion at The Western North Carolina Farmers’ Market $650,000 “Davis Arena renovation and expansion at the Western North Carolina Agricultural Center $6,765,461

Click to view

“(26) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of four million three hundred three thousand nine hundred forty-four dollars ($4,303,944) to finance the capital facility costs of completing an oyster hatchery.

“(27) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of two million seven hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000) to finance the capital improvement costs of completing an expansion and renovation to the polar bear exhibit at the North Carolina Zoo.

“(28) In the maximum aggregate principal amount of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to finance the capital improvement costs of acquiring State park lands and conservation areas for the Land for Tomorrow initiative in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources. Proceeds shall be allocated to support the conservation priorities of the One North Carolina Naturally program.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2008.’ ”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 30.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2008-2009 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2008-2009 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 30.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2008-118, s. 3.8, provides: “Section 1.1 of S.L. 2004-179, as amended by Section 30.3A of S.L. 2005-276 and Section 2.1 of S.L. 2006-146, authorized the State to issue or incur special indebtedness in order to provide funds to the State for Western Carolina University to be used, together with other available funds, to pay the cost of land acquisition, site preparation, engineering, architectural, and other consulting services and construction of a building for Western Carolina University and the Mountain Area Health Education Consortium for the North Carolina Center for Health and Aging to be operated as a consortium among Western Carolina University, the University of North Carolina at Asheville, and the Mountain Area Health Education Consortium.

“Western Carolina University, the University of North Carolina at Asheville, and the Mountain Area Health Education Consortium may expend available funds, including appropriations, for the operation and maintenance of this facility.” Section 1.1 of Session Laws 2004-179, as amended, is noted above, in full.

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2009.’ ”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 28.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 28.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2011-66, s. 1, provides: “This act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Debt Reduction Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-66, s. 4, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no funds shall be encumbered, contracts entered, or debt issued or authorized to be issued on or after the effective date of this act [May 3, 2011] for any of the projects or purposes deauthorized by or as a consequence of Sections 2 and 3 of this act, to the extent of the deauthorization.”

Session Laws
2011-227, s. 1, provides: “Notwithstanding Section 23.12(g) of S.L. 2006-66, the Department of Correction shall take appropriate measures, including maximizing the use of the Inmate Construction Program, to reduce the costs related to the construction of projects authorized by S.L. 2007-323 and S.L. 2008-107, as each is amended by S.L. 2009-209, to be financed with the proceeds of special indebtedness incurred pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes.
The Department of Correction, with approval of the Office of State Budget and Management, may use the proceeds of special indebtedness incurred for the original project made available by savings generated from such cost reductions, together with available funds, to provide additional funds for capital facility expenses for the completion of the Regional Medical Center and Mental Health Center in an amount not to exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000). Such alternate use of funds shall not require any further approval of the Council of State pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-78, s. 1, effective June 12, 2013, designated the previously undesignated provisions of the section as subsection (a), and, in subsection (a), added the subsection heading; and added subsection (b).

§ 142-84.
Procedure for incurrence or issuance of special indebtedness.

Notice and Certificate. — Whenever the State or a State agency determines that special indebtedness is appropriate to finance capital facilities, it shall notify the Department of Administration. If the Department of Administration concurs, it shall provide written notice to the State Treasurer advising the State Treasurer of this determination.After the filing of the notice and after any preliminary conference, the State Treasurer shall consult with the Office of State Budget and Management as to the revenues expected by that Office to be available to pay all sums to come due on the special indebtedness during its term. If, after consulting with the Office of State Budget and Management, the State Treasurer determines by written certificate that it may be desirable to use special indebtedness to finance the capital facilities, the Department of Administration shall request the Council of State to give its preliminary approval of the use of special indebtedness to finance the capital facilities. The Department of Administration must promptly file copies of the notice and certificate required by this subsection with the Governor and the Council of State.

Preliminary Approval. — The Council of State, upon receipt of the notice and certificate required by subsection (a) of this section, shall adopt a resolution granting or denying preliminary approval of the financing. A resolution granting preliminary approval may include any other terms, conditions, and restrictions the Council of State considers appropriate and not inconsistent with the provisions of this Article.

Final Approval. — Before any special indebtedness may be incurred or issued pursuant to this Article, the Council of State must authorize the indebtedness by resolution, either as part of or separate from the resolution required by subsection (b) of this section. The resolution must do all of the following:

Authorize the providing of a particular capital facility or, in general terms, the types or classifications of capital facilities to be provided.

Set the aggregate principal amount or maximum principal amount of the special indebtedness authorized.

Set the maturity or maximum maturity of the special indebtedness authorized.

Set the rate, rates, or maximum rate of interest, which may be fixed or vary over a period of time, of the special indebtedness authorized.

Include any other conditions or matters not inconsistent with the provisions of this Article in the discretion of the Council of State, which may include the adoption or approvals as may be authorized in

G.S. 142-88

and

G.S. 142-89

.

Financing Terms. — No special indebtedness shall be incurred or issued without the prior written approval of the State Treasurer as provided in this subsection, which is in addition to the certificate given by the State Treasurer pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. In determining whether to approve the proposed financing, the State Treasurer may consider any factors the State Treasurer considers relevant in order to find and determine all of the following:

The amounts to become due under the special indebtedness, including the interest component or rate, are adequate and not excessive for the purpose proposed.

The increase, if any, in State revenues, including taxes, necessary to pay the sums to become due under the special indebtedness is not excessive.

The special indebtedness can be incurred or issued on terms desirable to the State.

Designation of Facilities. — If the Council of State has authorized in general terms the types or classifications of capital facilities to be financed, then the particular capital facilities and the principal amount of special indebtedness to be incurred or issued for each particular capital facility shall be determined by the Department of Administration after considering any factors it considers relevant in order to determine that the particular capital facility to be provided is desirable for the efficient operation of the State and its agencies and is in the best interests of the State.

Type of Debt and Security. — In the absence of a determination by the Council of State, the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Department of Administration, shall determine the specific security offered and whether the special indebtedness to be issued or incurred shall be financing contract indebtedness, certificates of participation indebtedness, bonded indebtedness, or some combination of these.

Administration. — The State Treasurer, after consultation with the Department of Administration, shall develop appropriate documents for use under this Article. The State Treasurer shall employ and designate the financial consultants, fiduciaries and other agents, underwriters, and bond attorneys to be associated with the incurrence or issuance of special indebtedness pursuant to this Article.

Oversight by Joint Legislative Commission. — After all the requirements for approval and oversight provided in this section have been met, and at least five days before the issuance or incurrence of the special indebtedness, the State Treasurer must report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations. This report must include the details of the proposed special indebtedness, including the capital facilities to be financed by the indebtedness, the amount of the proposed indebtedness, the type of indebtedness to be issued or incurred, and any other information required by the Commission.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.